tr: Vücut kablosu konnektör stili: 2 uçlu; 3 uçlu; Süngü; Evrensel; Diğer
fi: Vartalojohdon liitintyyppi: 2-piikkinen; 3-piikkinen; Bajonetti; Universaali; Muu
ja: 本体コードコネクタースタイル: 2プロング; 3プロング; バヨネット; ユニバーサル; その他
ro-RO: Stil conector cablu corp: Cu 2 pini; Cu 3 pini; Baionetă; Universal; Altele
cs: Typ konektoru šermířské tělové šňůry: Dvoukolíkové; Tříkolíkové; Bajonetové; Univerzální; Jiné
de: Anschlussart des Körperkabels: 2-polig; 3-polig; Bajonett; Universal; Sonstige
it: Cordino per il corpo: A 2 poli; A 3 poli; A baionetta; Universale; Altro
sv: Anslutningsstil för kroppslina: 2-stifts; 3-stifts; Bajonett; Universell; Annan
sl-SI: Vrsta priključka za sabljaško žico: 2-polni; 3-polni; Bajonetni; Univerzalni; Drugo
pt-BR: Estilo do conector do cabo do corpo: 2 pinos; 3 pinos; Baioneta; Universal; Outros
da: Type af tilslutning til kropsledning: 2-bens; 3-bens; Bajonet; Universal; Andet
sk-SK: Typ konektora telového kábla: 2-kolíkový; 3-kolíkový; Bajonet; Univerzálny; Iné
pl: Typ złączy przewodu body cord: 2-bolcowe; 3-bolcowe; Bagnetowe; Uniwersalne; Inne
el: Τύπος συνδέσμου καλωδίου αμαξώματος: Με 2 ακίδες; Με 3 ακίδες; Bayonet; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
fr: Type de connecteur du fils de corps: 2 broches; 3 broches; Baïonnette; Universel; Autre
lt-LT: Korpuso laido jungties tipas: 2 kontaktų; 3 kontaktų; Bajonetinis; Universalus; Kitas
en: Body cord connector style: 2-prong; 3-prong; Bayonet; Universal; Other
zh-CN: 机身线材接口样式: 两脚式; 三脚式; 卡口式; 通用式; 其他
zh-TW: 身體繩接頭樣式: 2 腳位; 3 腳位; 卡口; 通用; 其他
nb: Kroppsledning kobling stil: 2-pinners; 3-pinners; Bajonett; Universell; Annet
bg-BG: Стил на конектора на свързващия кабел: С 2 щифта; С 3 щифта; Байонет; Универсален; Друго
hu: Testvezeték-csatlakozó típusa: Kétvillás; Háromvillás; Bajonett; Univerzális; Egyéb
th: รูปแบบตัวเชื่อมต่อระหว่างตัวดาบและเครื่องแต่งกาย: 2 ขา; 3 ขา; เขี้ยวล็อก; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de conector del cable corporal: 2 clavijas; 3 clavijas; Bayoneta; Universal; Otro
ko: 바디 코드 커넥터 유형: 2프롱; 3프롱; 바요넷; 범용; 기타
pt-PT: Estilo do conector do cabo do corpo: 2 pinos; 3 pinos; Baioneta; Universal; Outro
hr-HR: Body cord mehanizam sinkronizacije style: S 2 zupca; S 3 zupca; Bajonet; Univerzalni; Ostalo
vi: Kiểu đầu nối dây: 2 chân; 3 chân; Ngàm; Đa năng; Khác
nl: Lichaamssnoer type connector: 2-polig; 3-polig; Bajonet; Universeel; Overige
ru: Тип разъема шнура: Двухштырьковый; Трёхштырьковый; Байонет; Универсальный; Другое